Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2133
Waste or trespass; heir; rights.

An heir, whether a minor or of full age, may maintain an action for trespass or waste for injuries done in the time of his ancestors as well as in his own time, unless barred by the statute of limitations.

R.S.1867, Code § 639, p. 506;

R.S.1913, § 8250;

C.S.1922, § 9203;

C.S.1929, § 20-2135;

R.S.1943, § 25-2133.

Action to quiet title by administrator is not a bar to like action by heir. Eayrs v. Nason, 54 Neb. 143, 74 N.W. 408 (1898).